Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SAINT ANN'S RESIDENCE.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Saint Ann's Residence to design, construct, and equip the renovation and repair of its assisted living facility in the city of Duluth. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end